Rhode Island statutes. Title 18 Fiduciaries
Chapter 9.1 Spendthrift Trusts

18-9.1-1.
Spendthrift trusts — Establishment.

Any person creating an express trust for the benefit of any other person or persons may, by the terms of the trust, establish valid restraints on the voluntary and/or involuntary transfer of interests in the express trust by its beneficiaries, whether by way of anticipation or acceleration, assignment, hypothecation, or by virtue of legal process in judgment, execution, attachment, garnishment, bankruptcy, or otherwise.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 279, § 1.